Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2435
Permitholder; continuing requirements; return of permit; when.

A permitholder shall continue to meet the requirements of section 69-2433 during the time he or she holds the permit, except as provided in subsection (2) of section 69-2443. If, during such time, a permitholder does not continue to meet one or more of the requirements, the permitholder shall return his or her permit to the Nebraska State Patrol for revocation. If a permitholder does not return his or her permit, the permitholder is subject to having his or her permit revoked under section 69-2439.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB807, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB77, § 17.